Louisiana, session 2026, HB102.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:30(A)(1) and (8) and 30.1(A)(2) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 14:2(B)(63), 30(A)(13) and (B)(5), 30.1(C), and 93.3.1 are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§2. Definitions
* * *
B. In this Code, "crime of violence" means an offense that has, as an
element, the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the
person or property of another, and that, by its very nature, involves a substantial risk
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 102 ENROLLED
that physical force against the person or property of another may be used in the
course of committing the offense or an offense that involves the possession or use
of a dangerous weapon. The following enumerated offenses and attempts to commit
any of them are included as "crimes of violence":
* * *
(63) Second degree cruelty to the elderly and persons with infirmities.
* * *
§30. First degree murder
A. First degree murder is the killing of a human being:
(1) When the offender has specific intent to kill or to inflict great bodily
harm and is engaged in the perpetration or attempted perpetration of aggravated
kidnapping, second degree kidnapping, aggravated escape, aggravated arson,
aggravated or first degree rape, forcible or second degree rape, aggravated burglary,
armed robbery, assault by drive-by shooting, first degree robbery, second degree
robbery, simple robbery, terrorism, cruelty to juveniles, second degree cruelty to
juveniles, or cruelty to the elderly and persons with infirmities, or second degree
cruelty to the elderly and persons with infirmities.
* * *
(8) When the offender has specific intent to kill or to inflict great bodily
harm and the offense is committed in any of the following circumstances:
(a) When there has been issued by a judge or magistrate any lawful order
prohibiting contact between the offender and the victim in response to threats of
physical violence or harm which was served on the offender and is in effect at the
time of the homicide.
(b) When the offender, while released on bail, on probation, or under parole
supervision, commits the offense in violation of a specific restriction or condition
imposed by the court, the committee on parole, or by law.
(c) When a firearm is used in committing the offense and the offender was
prohibited by law from possessing a firearm at the time of the offense.
* * *
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 102 ENROLLED
(13) When the offender has specific intent to kill or to inflict great bodily
harm upon a victim who is in a public place and the offender knowingly creates a
risk of death or great bodily harm to three or more persons.
* * *
B.
* * *
(5) For the purposes of Subsection A of this Section, there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the act of pointing and discharging a firearm at another
human being constitutes specific intent to kill or to inflict great bodily harm upon
that person.
* * *
§30.1. Second degree murder
A. Second degree murder is the killing of a human being:
* * *
(2) When the offender is engaged in the perpetration or attempted
perpetration of aggravated or first degree rape, forcible or second degree rape,
aggravated arson, aggravated burglary, aggravated kidnapping, second degree
kidnapping, aggravated escape, resisting a police officer with force or violence,
assault by drive-by shooting, armed robbery, first degree robbery, second degree
robbery, simple robbery, cruelty to juveniles, second degree cruelty to juveniles,
cruelty to the elderly and persons with infirmities, second degree cruelty to the
elderly and persons with infirmities, or terrorism, even though he has no intent to kill
or to inflict great bodily harm.
* * *
C. For the purposes of Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section, there shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the act of pointing and firing a firearm at another human
being constitutes specific intent to kill or inflict great bodily harm.
* * *
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 102 ENROLLED
§93.3.1. Second degree cruelty to the elderly and persons with infirmities
A. Second degree cruelty to the elderly and persons with infirmities is the
intentional or criminally negligent mistreatment or neglect by any person or
caregiver which causes serious bodily injury to a person with an infirmity, an adult
with a disability, or a person who is elderly, including but not limited to a person
who is a resident of a nursing home, facility for persons with intellectual disabilities,
mental health facility, hospital, or any other residential facility.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1)(a) "Caregiver" means any person who is temporarily or permanently
responsible, whether such care is voluntarily assumed or is assigned, for the care of
a person with an infirmity, an adult with a physical or mental disability, or a person
who is elderly.
(b) "Caregiver" includes but is not limited to any of the following individuals
or entities who have voluntarily assumed the care of, been assigned the care of, or
have voluntarily assumed a residence with a person who is elderly, a person with an
infirmity, or an adult with a disability:
(i) Adult children.
(ii) Parents.
(iii) Relatives.
(iv) Neighbors.
(v) Daycare institutions and facilities.
(vi) Adult congregate living facilities.
(vii) Nursing homes.
(2) "Elderly" means any individual who is sixty years of age or older.
C. The providing of treatment by a caregiver in accordance with a
well-recognized spiritual method of healing, in lieu of medical treatment, shall not
for that reason alone be considered the intentional or criminally negligent
mistreatment or neglect of a person with an infirmity, an adult with a disability, or
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 102 ENROLLED
a person who is elderly. The provisions of this Subsection shall be an affirmative
defense to a prosecution pursuant to this Section.
D. Whoever commits the crime of second degree cruelty to the elderly and
persons with infirmities shall be imprisoned at hard labor for not more than forty
years.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.